Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-13] Payment of debt service on the
Turtle Bay reimbursable general obligation bonds. Notwithstanding any laws
to the contrary:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, a nonprofit land
conservation organization shall file an application annually with the board
requesting $1,500,000 from the land conservation fund to be used for the
reimbursement of debt service on the Turtle Bay reimbursable general obligation
bonds until the bonds are fully amortized;

(2) The board shall not require the nonprofit land
conservation organization that is the recipient of a grant for the payment of
debt service on the Turtle Bay reimbursable general obligation bonds to provide
any additional matching funds; and

(3) Moneys awarded for the payment of debt service on
the Turtle Bay reimbursable general obligation bonds shall be deposited into
the Turtle Bay conservation easement special fund. [L 2015, c 121, §3]

Cross References

Turtle Bay reimbursable general obligation bonds, see
§171-171.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next